California statutes. Public Utilities Code
(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 396, Sec. 23.   (AB 1513)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Section conditionally inoperative.    Repealed on date prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

451.2.

(a) In an application by an electrical corporation to recover costs and expenses arising from, or incurred as a result of, a catastrophic wildfire with an ignition date in the 2017 calendar year, the commission shall determine whether those costs and expenses are just and reasonable in accordance with Section 451.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 451, when allocating costs, the commission shall consider the electrical corporation’s financial status and determine the maximum amount the corporation can pay without harming ratepayers or materially impacting its ability to provide adequate and safe service. The commission shall ensure that the costs or expenses described in subdivision (a) that are disallowed for recovery in rates assessed for the
 wildfires, in the aggregate, do not exceed that amount.

(c) An electrical corporation may apply for a financing order pursuant to Article 5.8 (commencing of Section 850) of Chapter 4 for the amount of costs and expenses allocated to the ratepayer as just and reasonable or as disallowed for recovery but exceeding the amount determined pursuant to subdivision (b).

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 626, Sec. 27.   (SB 901)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

451.3.

If the commission finds that an electrical corporation is requesting recovery of costs that were previously authorized by the commission for cost recovery by the electrical corporation, the commission may fine the electrical corporation an amount up to three times the amount of the penalty provided in Section 2107 for each violation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 79, Sec. 7.   (AB 1054)   Effective July 12, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

451.5.

(a) Any expense resulting from a bonus paid to an executive officer of a public utility that has ceased to pay its debts in the ordinary course of business shall not be recoverable either directly or indirectly in rates and shall be borne exclusively by the shareholders of the public utility. This prohibition shall be operative for a period of no less than two years after the public utility resumes paying its debts in the ordinary course of business, and shall be operative for any additional time period as determined by the commission.

(b) The requirements of subdivision (a) do not apply to a bonus that is specifically defined in a standard employee compensation contract.

(c) For purposes of this section, “executive officer” means any person who performs policy making functions and is employed by the public utility subject to the approval of the board of directors, and includes the president, secretary, treasurer, and any vice president in charge of a principal business unit, division, or function of the public utility.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 759, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

451.7.

(a) Nonbypassable or departing load surcharges, as defined by the commission, shall not apply to a reduction in kilowatthours of electricity that an electrical corporation customer consumes from the electrical grid in a metered interval due to industrial process heat recovery technology, up to a cap established by the commission.

(b) In order to receive the exemption pursuant to subdivision (a), the industrial process heat recovery technology shall meet all of the following requirements:

(1) The industrial process heat recovered to produce electricity is integral to the industrial process.

(2) The industrial process
 heat recovered to produce electricity is created by the industrial process.

(3) No supplemental firing or fuel use occurs to increase or to stabilize the steam’s temperature.

(4) The electricity generated by the industrial process heat recovery technology has zero marginal greenhouse gas emissions associated with it.

(5) The electricity generated by the industrial process heat recovery technology is fully self-consumed onsite during a manufacturing process.

(6) The electricity generated by the industrial process heat recovery technology is not exported to the electrical grid for sale into the wholesale market.

(7) The electricity generated by the industrial process heat recovery technology
 does not exceed 25 percent of the installing customer’s peak electrical load at the time of installation.

(8) The industrial process heat recovery technology has a minimum nameplate rating of 500 kilowatts.

(9) The industrial process heat recovery technology is installed on or after January 1, 2024.

(c) In implementing the exemption in subdivision (a), the commission shall minimize the cost impacts to all nonparticipating customers that are directly attributable to the nonbypassable or departing load charges of customers using industrial process heat recovery technology pursuant to subdivision (b).

(d) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Industrial process
 heat recovery” means a process that captures and reuses heat that would otherwise not be used, without any additional fuel input or supplemental firing, thereby reducing the electrical consumption of the industrial process.

(2) “Reduction” means a reduction from the baseline electrical load of the industrial process before installation of the industrial process heat recovery technology.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 700, Sec. 3.   (AB 2109)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

451.8.

(a) Following the approval of each general rate case, the commission shall review which costs, if any, differed from the general rate case forecasts for each electrical corporation or gas
 corporation. The commission shall adjust the authorized revenue requirement in the subsequent general rate case, as appropriate, based on the actual past costs the corporation records.

(b) (1) The commission shall establish guidelines for electrical corporations and gas corporations to calculate and report their actual rates of return to the commission.

(2) The commission shall require electrical corporations and gas corporations to report their actual rates of return to the commission annually.

(3) The commission shall adopt
 processes to adequately track an electrical corporation’s or gas corporation’s actual rate of return relative to its forecasted rate of return and shall require the corporation to identify the cost categories where projected costs differed from actual costs.

(c) This section does not restrict, limit, or otherwise affect the commission’s obligation to ensure that rates are sufficient to enable an electrical corporation or gas corporation to recover a just and reasonable amount of revenue, pursuant to Section 451, including a reasonable return.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 413, Sec. 1.   (AB 2666)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

451.9.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 451, a gas corporation may cease providing service in an area within its service territory where a pilot project has been implemented pursuant to Section 663 if the commission determines that adequate substitute energy service is reasonably available to support the energy end uses of affected gas corporation customers.

(b) (1) In determining what constitutes adequate substitute energy service and when the substitute energy service is reasonably available, the commission shall adopt guidelines necessary to ensure that the rates for substitute energy service are just and reasonable as provided by a load-serving entity as the provider of last resort pursuant to Section 387.

(2) The commission may authorize a gas corporation to recover the undepreciated costs of any gas plant or asset, including the cost to retire the gas plant or
 asset that will no longer be used and useful. The commission shall determine the just and reasonable recovery of undepreciated costs, including the period over which the undepreciated costs are recovered so as to minimize impacts to remaining gas distribution system customers.

(c) This section does not modify the authority of the commission to determine adequate, efficient, just, and reasonable service. 

(d) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) or (3), this section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2031, and as of that date is repealed.

(2) Paragraph (1) does not affect the termination of a gas corporation’s obligation to provide service that is authorized under this section on or before January 1, 2031.

(3) Paragraph (1) does not affect the authority of the commission under this section to relieve a gas corporation of its obligation to provide service within the approved boundary of a pilot project approved pursuant to Section 663 that is pending as of January 1, 2031.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 602, Sec. 2.   (SB 1221)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Conditionally repealed as of January 1, 2031, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

452.

Nothing in this part shall be construed to prohibit any common carrier from establishing and charging a lower than a maximum reasonable rate for the transportation of property when the needs of commerce or public interest require. However, no common carrier subject to the jurisdiction of the commission may establish a rate less than a maximum reasonable rate for the transportation of property for the purpose of meeting the competitive charges of other carriers or the cost of other means of transportation which is less than the charges of competing carriers or the cost of transportation which might be incurred through other means of
 transportation, except upon such showing as is required by the commission and a finding by it that the rate is justified by transportation conditions. In determining the extent of such competition the commission shall make due and reasonable allowance for added or accessorial service performed by one carrier or agency of transportation which is not contemporaneously performed by the competing agency of transportation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

453.

(a) No public utility shall, as to rates, charges, service, facilities, or in any other respect, make or grant any preference or advantage to any corporation or person or subject any corporation or person to any prejudice or disadvantage.

(b) No public utility shall prejudice, disadvantage, or require different rates or deposit amounts from a person because of ancestry, medical condition, marital status or change in marital status, occupation, or any characteristic listed or
 defined in Section 11135 of the Government Code. A person who has exhausted all administrative remedies with the commission may institute a suit for injunctive relief and reasonable attorney’s fees in cases of an alleged violation of this subdivision. If successful in litigation, the prevailing party shall be awarded attorney’s fees.

(c) No public utility shall establish or maintain any unreasonable difference as to rates, charges, service, facilities, or in any other respect, either as between localities or as between classes of service.

(d) No public utility shall include with any bill for services or commodities furnished any customer or subscriber any advertising or literature designed or intended (1) to promote the passage or defeat of a measure appearing on the ballot at any election whether local, statewide, or national, (2) to
 promote or defeat any candidate for nomination or election to any public office, (3) to promote or defeat the appointment of any person to any administrative or executive position in federal, state, or local government, or (4) to promote or defeat any change in federal, state, or local legislation or regulations.

(e) The commission may determine any question of fact arising under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 568, Sec. 43.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

453.5.

Whenever the commission orders rate refunds to be distributed, the commission shall require public utilities to pay refunds to all current utility customers, and, when practicable, to prior customers, on an equitable pro rata basis without regard as to whether or not the customer is classifiable as a residential or commercial tenant, landlord, homeowner, business, industrial, educational, governmental, nonprofit, agricultural, or any other type of entity.

For the purposes of this section, “equitable pro rata basis” shall mean in proportion to the amount originally paid for the utility service
 involved, or in proportion to the amount of such utility service actually received.

Nothing in this section shall prevent the commission from authorizing refunds to residential and other small customers to be based on current usage.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 897.)
-------------------------------------------

454.

(a) Except as provided in Section 455, a public utility shall not change any rate or so alter any classification, contract, practice, or rule as to result in any new rate, except upon a showing before the commission and a finding by the commission that the new rate is justified. Whenever any electrical, gas, heat, telephone, water, or sewer system corporation files an application to change any rate, other than a change reflecting and passing through to customers only
 new costs to the corporation which do not result in changes in revenue allocation, for the services or commodities furnished by it, the corporation shall furnish to its customers affected by the proposed rate change notice of its application to the commission for approval of the new rate. This notice requirement does not apply to any rate change proposed by a corporation pursuant to an advice letter submitted to the commission in accordance with commission procedures for this means of submission. The procedures for advice letters may include provision for notice to customers or subscribers on a case-by-case basis, as determined by the commission. The corporation may include the notice with the regular bill for charges transmitted to the customers within 45 days if the corporation operates on a 30-day billing cycle, or within 75 days if the corporation operates on a 60-day billing cycle. If more than one application to change any rate is filed within a single billing cycle, the corporation may combine the
 notices into a single notice if the applications are separately identified. The notice shall state the amount of the proposed rate change expressed in both dollar and percentage terms for the entire rate change as well as for each customer classification, a brief statement of the reasons the change is required or sought, and the mailing, and if available, the email address of the commission to which any customer inquiries may be directed regarding how to participate in, or receive further notices regarding the date, time, or place of, any hearing on the application, and the mailing address of the corporation to which any customer inquiries relative to the proposed rate change may be directed.

(b) For a water corporation with more than 2,000 service connections, the notice required in subdivision (a) shall include estimated rate impacts on the various customer classes of the corporation. The commission may require the corporation to inform
 customers in a separate letter or through a bill insert, at the corporation’s discretion, of the outcome of the general rate case, within 60 days if the corporation operates on a 30-day billing cycle, or within 90 days if the corporation operates on a 60-day billing cycle, of the commission’s final decision, including the approved rates and the approved capital projects that will subsequently be executed by way of an advice letter.

(c) The commission may adopt rules it considers reasonable and proper for each class of public utility providing for the nature of the showing required to be made in support of proposed rate changes, the form and manner of the presentation of the showing, with or without a hearing, and the procedure to be followed in the consideration thereof. Rules applicable to common carriers may provide for the publication and filing of any proposed rate change together with a written showing in support thereof, giving notice of
 the filing and showing in support thereof to the public, granting an opportunity for protests thereto, and to the consideration of, and action on, the showing and any protests filed thereto by the commission, with or without hearing. However, the proposed rate change does not become effective until it has been approved by the commission.

(d) The commission shall permit individual public utility customers and subscribers affected by a proposed rate change, and organizations formed to represent their interests, to testify at any hearing on the proposed rate change, except that the presiding officer need not allow repetitive or irrelevant testimony and may conduct the hearing in an efficient manner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 224, Sec. 2.   (SB 1364)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

454.1.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), if a customer with a maximum peak electrical demand in excess of 20 kilowatts located or planning to locate within the service territory of an electrical corporation receives a bona fide offer for electric service from an irrigation district at rates less than the electrical corporation’s tariffed rates, the electrical corporation may discount its noncommodity rates, but may not discount its noncommodity rates below its distribution marginal cost of serving that customer. For purposes of this subdivision, the costs of the electric commodity shall be excluded from both the irrigation district and electric corporation’s rates. The electrical corporation may recover any difference between its tariffed and
 discounted service from its remaining customers, allocated as determined by the commission. However, the reallocation may not increase rates to its remaining customers by any greater amount than the rates would be increased if the customer had taken electric distribution service from the irrigation district and the irrigation district had paid the charge established in subdivision (e) of Section 9607. Further, there shall be a firewall preventing the reallocation of such differences resulting from discounting to residential customers or to commercial customers with maximum peak demands not in excess of 20 kilowatts.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not apply to a cumulative 75 megawatts of load served by the Merced Irrigation District, determined as follows:

(1) The load is located within the boundaries of Merced Irrigation District, as those boundaries existed on December 20, 1995,
 together with the territory of Castle Air Force Base which was located outside the district on that date.

(2) For purposes of this section, a megawatt of load shall be calculated in accordance with the methodology established by the Energy Commission in its Docket No. 96-IRR-1890.

(c) Subdivision (a) applies to the load of customers that move to the areas described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) after December 31, 2000, and such load shall be excluded from the calculation of the 75 megawatts in subdivision (b).

(d) If an electrical corporation seeks to apply the discounts permitted under subdivision (a) within the geographic area described in subdivision (b) of Section 9610, the electrical corporation’s resulting rate for distribution service may not be less than 120 percent of the electrical corporation’s
 marginal distribution cost of serving that customer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 842, Sec. 12.   (SB 1222)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

454.2.

Notwithstanding Section 454, the commission may establish a “zone of rate freedom” for any passenger stage transportation service which is operating in competition with other passenger transportation service from any means of transportation, if the competition together with the authorized zone of rate freedom will result in reasonable rates and charges for the passenger stage transportation service. An adjustment in rates or charges within a zone of rate freedom established by the commission is hereby deemed just and reasonable. The commission may, upon protest or
 on its own motion, suspend any adjustment in rates or charges under this section and institute proceedings under its rules of practice and procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 1005, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

454.3.

The commission may, after a hearing, approve an increase of from one-half of 1 percent to 1 percent in the rate of return otherwise allowed an electrical corporation on its electric plant for investment by the corporation in facilities meeting one of the following requirements:

(a) The facility is designed to generate electricity from a renewable resource, including, but not limited to, solar energy, geothermal steam, wind, and hydroelectric power at new or existing dams; the facility is subject to Resources Agency review of its environmental impacts
 and determination that the facility is environmentally acceptable; its capital costs, when added to its costs of operation and maintenance, result in a cost of electricity generated over the useful life of the facility less than that of electricity generated by existing facilities utilizing nuclear power or fossil fuel; and the facility is used and useful. 

(b) The facility is capable of meeting the then applicable environmental pollution standards; its capital costs, when added to its costs of operation and maintenance, result in a cost of electricity generated over the useful life of the facility less than that of electricity generated by existing facilities utilizing nuclear power or fossil fuel; and the facility is used and useful.

(c) The facility is experimental and is, in the determination of the commission, reasonably designed to improve or perfect technology for the
 generation of electricity from renewable resources or to more efficiently utilize other resources in a manner which will decrease environmental pollution from and lower the costs of the electricity generated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 108, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

454.4.

The commission shall establish rates for gas which is utilized in cogeneration technology projects not higher than the rates established for gas utilized as a fuel by an electric plant in the generation of electricity, except that this rate shall apply only to that quantity of gas which an electrical corporation serving the area where a cogeneration technology project is located, or an equivalent area, would require in the generation of an equivalent amount of electricity based on the corporation’s average annual incremental heat rate and reasonable transmission losses or that quantity of gas actually consumed by
 the cogeneration technology project in the sequential production of electricity and steam, heat, or useful work, whichever is the lower quantity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 840, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

454.5.

(a) The commission shall specify the allocation of electricity, including quantity, characteristics, and duration of electricity delivery, that the Department of Water Resources shall provide under its power purchase agreements to the customers of each electrical corporation, which shall be reflected in the electrical corporation’s proposed procurement plan. Each electrical corporation shall file a proposed procurement plan with the commission not later than 60 days after the commission specifies the allocation of electricity. The proposed procurement plan shall specify the date that the electrical corporation intends to resume procurement of electricity for its retail customers, consistent with its obligation to serve. After the commission’s adoption of a procurement plan, the commission shall allow not less than 60 days before
 the electrical corporation resumes procurement pursuant to this section.

(b) An electrical corporation’s proposed procurement plan shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) An assessment of the price risk associated with the electrical corporation’s portfolio, including any utility-retained generation, existing power purchase and exchange contracts, and proposed contracts or purchases under which an electrical corporation will procure electricity, electricity demand reductions, and electricity-related products and the remaining open position to be served by spot market transactions.

(2) A definition of each electricity product, electricity-related product, and procurement-related financial product, including support and justification for the product type and amount to be procured under the
 plan.

(3) The duration of the plan.

(4) The duration, timing, and range of quantities of each product to be procured.

(5) A competitive procurement process under which the electrical corporation may request bids for procurement-related services, including the format and criteria of that procurement process.

(6) An incentive mechanism, if any incentive mechanism is proposed, including the type of transactions to be covered by that mechanism, their respective procurement benchmarks, and other parameters needed to determine the sharing of risks and benefits.

(7) The upfront standards and criteria by which the acceptability and eligibility for rate recovery of a proposed procurement
 transaction will be known by the electrical corporation before execution of the transaction. This shall include an expedited approval process for the commission’s review of proposed contracts and subsequent approval or rejection of a contract. The electrical corporation shall propose alternative procurement choices in the event a contract is rejected.

(8) Procedures for updating the procurement plan.

(9) A showing that the procurement plan will achieve the following:

(A) The electrical corporation, in order to fulfill its unmet resource needs, shall procure resources from eligible renewable energy resources in an amount sufficient to meet its procurement requirements pursuant to the California Renewables Portfolio Standard Program (Article 16 (commencing with Section 399.11) of Chapter 2.3).

(B) The electrical corporation shall create or maintain a diversified procurement portfolio consisting of both short-term and long-term electricity and electricity-related and demand reduction products.

(C) (i) The electrical corporation shall first meet its unmet resource needs through all available energy efficiency and demand reduction resources that are cost effective, reliable, and feasible.

(ii) In determining the availability of cost-effective, reliable, and feasible demand reduction resources, the commission shall consider the findings regarding technically and economically achievable demand reduction in the Demand Response Potential Study required pursuant to Commission Order D.14-12-024, to the extent those findings are not superseded by other demand reduction studies conducted by
 academic institutions or government agencies, and to the extent that any demand reduction is consistent with commission policy.

(D) (i) The electrical corporation, in soliciting bids for new gas-fired generating units, shall actively seek bids for resources that are not gas-fired generating units located in communities that suffer from cumulative pollution burdens, including, but not limited to, high emission levels of toxic air contaminants, criteria air pollutants, and greenhouse gases.

(ii) In considering bids for, or negotiating contracts for, new gas-fired generating units, the electrical corporation shall provide greater preference to resources that are not gas-fired generating units located in communities that suffer from cumulative pollution burdens, including, but not limited to, high emission levels of toxic air contaminants, criteria air
 pollutants, and greenhouse gases.

(iii) This subparagraph does not apply to contracts signed by an electrical corporation and approved by the commission before January 1, 2017.

(10) The electrical corporation’s risk management policy, strategy, and practices, including specific measures of price stability.

(11) A plan to achieve appropriate increases in diversity of ownership and diversity of fuel supply of nonutility electrical generation.

(12) A mechanism for recovery of reasonable administrative costs related to procurement in the generation component of rates.

(c) The commission shall review and accept, modify, or reject each electrical corporation’s procurement plan and any amendments
 or updates to the plan. The commission shall ensure that the plan contains the elements required by this section, including the elements described in subparagraphs (C) and (D) of paragraph (9) of subdivision (b). The commission’s review shall consider each electrical corporation’s individual procurement situation, and shall give strong consideration to that situation in determining which one or more of the features set forth in this subdivision shall apply to that electrical corporation. A procurement plan approved by the commission shall contain one or more of the following features, provided that the commission may not approve a feature or mechanism for an electrical corporation if it finds that the feature or mechanism would impair the restoration of an electrical corporation’s creditworthiness or would lead to a deterioration of an electrical corporation’s creditworthiness:

(1) A competitive procurement process under which the electrical
 corporation may request bids for procurement-related services. The commission shall specify the format of that procurement process, as well as criteria to ensure that the auction process is open and adequately subscribed. Any purchases made in compliance with the commission-authorized process shall be recovered in the generation component of rates.

(2) An incentive mechanism that establishes a procurement benchmark or benchmarks and authorizes the electrical corporation to procure from the market, subject to comparing the electrical corporation’s performance to the commission-authorized benchmark or benchmarks. The incentive mechanism shall be clear, achievable, and contain quantifiable objectives and standards. The incentive mechanism shall contain balanced risk and reward incentives that limit the risk and reward of an electrical corporation.

(3) Upfront achievable standards and
 criteria by which the acceptability and eligibility for rate recovery of a proposed procurement transaction will be known by the electrical corporation before the execution of the bilateral contract for the transaction. The commission shall provide for expedited review and either approve or reject the individual contracts submitted by the electrical corporation to ensure compliance with its procurement plan. To the extent the commission rejects a proposed contract pursuant to this criteria, the commission shall designate alternative procurement choices obtained in the procurement plan that will be recoverable for ratemaking purposes.

(d) A procurement plan approved by the commission shall accomplish each of the following objectives:

(1) Enable the electrical corporation to fulfill its obligation to serve its customers at just and reasonable rates.

(2) Eliminate the need for after-the-fact reasonableness reviews of an electrical corporation’s actions in compliance with an approved procurement plan, including resulting electricity procurement contracts, practices, and related expenses. However, the commission may establish a regulatory process to verify and ensure that each contract was administered in accordance with the terms of the contract, and contract disputes that may arise are reasonably resolved.

(3) Ensure timely recovery of prospective procurement costs incurred pursuant to an approved procurement plan. The commission shall establish rates based on forecasts of procurement costs adopted by the commission, actual procurement costs incurred, or a combination thereof, as determined by the commission. The commission shall establish power procurement balancing accounts to track the differences between recorded revenues and
 costs incurred pursuant to an approved procurement plan. The commission shall review the power procurement balancing accounts, not less than semiannually, and shall adjust rates or order refunds, as necessary, to promptly amortize a balancing account, according to a schedule determined by the commission. Until January 1, 2006, the commission shall ensure that any overcollection or undercollection in the power procurement balancing account does not exceed 5 percent of the electrical corporation’s actual recorded generation revenues for the prior calendar year excluding revenues collected for the Department of Water Resources. The commission shall determine the schedule for amortizing the overcollection or undercollection in the balancing account to ensure that the 5-percent threshold is not exceeded. After January 1, 2006, this adjustment shall occur when deemed appropriate by the commission consistent with the objectives of this section.

(4) Moderate the price risk associated with serving its retail customers, including the price risk embedded in its long-term supply contracts, by authorizing an electrical corporation to enter into financial and other electricity-related product contracts.

(5) Provide for just and reasonable rates, with an appropriate balancing of price stability and price level in the electrical corporation’s procurement plan.

(e) The commission shall provide for the periodic review and prospective modification of an electrical corporation’s procurement plan.

(f) The commission may engage an independent consultant or advisory service to evaluate risk management and strategy. The reasonable cost of any consultant or advisory service is a reimbursable expense and eligible for funding pursuant to Section 631.

(g) The commission shall adopt appropriate procedures to ensure the confidentiality of any market sensitive information submitted in an electrical corporation’s proposed procurement plan or resulting from or related to its approved procurement plan, including, but not limited to, proposed or executed power purchase agreements, data request responses, or consultant reports, or any combination of these, provided that the Public Advocate’s Office of the Public Utilities Commission and other consumer groups that are nonmarket participants shall be provided access to this information under confidentiality procedures authorized by the commission.

(h) This section does not alter, modify, or amend the commission’s oversight of affiliate transactions under its rules and decisions or the commission’s existing authority to investigate and penalize an electrical corporation’s alleged fraudulent
 activities, or to disallow costs incurred as a result of gross incompetence, fraud, abuse, or similar grounds. This section does not expand, modify, or limit the Energy Commission’s existing authority and responsibilities as set forth in Sections 25216, 25216.5, and 25323 of the Public Resources Code.

(i) An electrical corporation that serves less than 500,000 electric retail customers within the state may file with the commission a request for exemption from this section, which the commission shall grant upon a showing of good cause.

(j) (1) Before its approval pursuant to Section 851 of any divestiture of generation assets owned by an electrical corporation on or after September 24, 2002, the commission shall determine the impact of the proposed divestiture on the electrical corporation’s procurement rates and shall approve a divestiture only to the extent
 it finds, taking into account the effect of the divestiture on procurement rates, that the divestiture is in the public interest and will result in net ratepayer benefits.

(2) Any electrical corporation’s procurement necessitated as a result of the divestiture of generation assets on or after September 24, 2002, shall be subject to the mechanisms and procedures set forth in this section only if its actual cost is less than the recent historical cost of the divested generation assets.

(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (2), the commission may deem proposed procurement eligible to use the procedures in this section upon its approval of asset divestiture pursuant to Section 851.

(k) The commission shall direct electrical corporations to include in their proposed procurement plans the integration costs described and
 determined pursuant to clause (v) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 399.13.

(l) Before approving an electrical corporation’s contract for any new gas-fired generating unit, the commission shall require the electrical corporation to demonstrate compliance with its approved procurement plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 370, Sec. 250.   (SB 1371)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

454.51.

The commission shall do all of the following:

(a) Identify a diverse and balanced portfolio of resources needed to ensure a reliable electricity supply that provides optimal integration of renewable energy and resource diversity in a cost-effective manner. The portfolio shall be used by the commission to establish integrated resource planning-based procurement requirements that rely on zero-carbon-emitting resources to the maximum extent reasonable and be designed to achieve the state policy specified in Section 454.53 and any statewide greenhouse gas emissions limit established pursuant to the California Global Warming Solutions Act of 2006 (Division 25.5 (commencing with Section 38500) of the Health and Safety Code) or any successor legislation.

(b) Direct each electrical corporation to include, as part of its proposed procurement plan, a strategy for procuring best-fit and least-cost resources to satisfy the portfolio needs identified by the commission pursuant to subdivision (a).

(c) Ensure that the net costs of any incremental renewable energy integration resources or diverse resources, procured by an electrical corporation to satisfy the need identified in subdivision (a) are allocated on a fully nonbypassable basis consistent with the treatment of costs identified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 365.1.

(d) Permit community choice aggregators to submit proposals for satisfying their portion of the renewable integration and diverse resources need identified in subdivision (a). If the commission finds this need is best met through long-term
 procurement commitments for resources, community choice aggregators shall also be required to make long-term commitments for resources. The commission shall approve proposals pursuant to this subdivision if it finds all of the following:

(1) The resources proposed by a community choice aggregator will provide equivalent integration of renewable energy.

(2) The resources proposed by a community choice aggregator will promote the efficient achievement of state energy policy objectives, including reductions in greenhouse gas emissions.

(3) Bundled customers of an electrical corporation will be indifferent from the approval of the community choice aggregator proposals.

(e) Ensure that all costs resulting from nonperformance to satisfy the need identified in